Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 70A.24, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. A state employee entitled to leave under the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 shall be provided paid leave for such time as specified in this section for the birth of a child or placement of a child for adoption with the employee if the leave is taken within twelve months following any such birth or adoption. House File 2502, p. 2 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2502, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor